prince/dictionaries/hu.aff
SFX I   ok   unké         ok
SFX I   ok   unkul        ok
SFX I   ok   unktól       ok
SFX I   ok   unkról       ok
SFX I   ok   unkra        ok
SFX I   ok   unkon        ok
SFX I   ok   unknál       ok
SFX I   ok   unknak       ok
SFX I   ok   unkként      ok
SFX I   ok   unkká        ok
SFX I   ok   unkkor       ok
SFX I   ok   unkkal       ok
SFX I   ok   unkig        ok
SFX I   ok   unkhoz       ok
SFX I   ok   unkból       ok
SFX I   ok   unkban       ok
SFX I   ok   unkba        ok
SFX I   ok   unkat        ok
SFX I   ok   unk          ok
SFX I   ok   ukéért       ok
SFX I   ok   ukévá        ok
SFX I   ok   ukéval       ok
SFX I   ok   ukéul        ok
SFX I   ok   ukétól       ok
SFX I   ok   ukét         ok
SFX I   ok   ukéról       ok
SFX I   ok   ukért        ok
SFX I   ok   ukéra        ok
SFX I   ok   ukénál       ok
SFX I   ok   ukénak       ok
SFX I   ok   ukén         ok
SFX I   ok   ukéiért      ok
SFX I   ok   ukéivá       ok
SFX I   ok   ukéival      ok
SFX I   ok   ukéiul       ok
SFX I   ok   ukéitól      ok
SFX I   ok   ukéit        ok
SFX I   ok   ukéiról      ok
SFX I   ok   ukéira       ok
SFX I   ok   ukéinál      ok
SFX I   ok   ukéinak      ok
SFX I   ok   ukéin        ok
SFX I   ok   ukéiig       ok
SFX I   ok   ukéihoz      ok
SFX I   ok   ukéig        ok
SFX I   ok   ukéiból      ok
SFX I   ok   ukéiban      ok
SFX I   ok   ukéiba       ok
SFX I   ok   ukéi         ok
SFX I   ok   ukéhoz       ok
SFX I   ok   ukéból       ok
SFX I   ok   ukéban       ok
SFX I   ok   ukéba        ok
SFX I   ok   uké          ok
SFX I   ok   ukul         ok
SFX I   ok   uktól        ok
SFX I   ok   ukról        ok
SFX I   ok   ukra         ok
SFX I   ok   ukon         ok
SFX I   ok   uknál        ok
SFX I   ok   uknak        ok
SFX I   ok   ukként       ok
SFX I   ok   ukká         ok
SFX I   ok   ukkor        ok
SFX I   ok   ukkal        ok
SFX I   ok   ukig         ok
SFX I   ok   ukhoz        ok
SFX I   ok   ukból        ok
SFX I   ok   ukban        ok
SFX I   ok   ukba         ok
SFX I   ok   ukat         ok
SFX I   ok   uk           ok
SFX I   ok   otokéért     ok
SFX I   ok   otokévá      ok
SFX I   ok   otokéval     ok
SFX I   ok   otokéul      ok
SFX I   ok   otokétól     ok
SFX I   ok   otokét       ok
SFX I   ok   otokéról     ok
SFX I   ok   otokért      ok
SFX I   ok   otokéra      ok
SFX I   ok   otokénál     ok
SFX I   ok   otokénak     ok
SFX I   ok   otokén       ok
SFX I   ok   otokéiért    ok
SFX I   ok   otokéivá     ok
SFX I   ok   otokéival    ok
SFX I   ok   otokéiul     ok
SFX I   ok   otokéitól    ok
SFX I   ok   otokéit      ok
SFX I   ok   otokéiról    ok
SFX I   ok   otokéira     ok
SFX I   ok   otokéinál    ok
SFX I   ok   otokéinak    ok
SFX I   ok   otokéin      ok
SFX I   ok   otokéiig     ok
SFX I   ok   otokéihoz    ok
SFX I   ok   otokéig      ok
SFX I   ok   otokéiból    ok
SFX I   ok   otokéiban    ok
SFX I   ok   otokéiba     ok
SFX I   ok   otokéi       ok
SFX I   ok   otokéhoz     ok
SFX I   ok   otokéból     ok
SFX I   ok   otokéban     ok
SFX I   ok   otokéba      ok
SFX I   ok   otoké        ok
SFX I   ok   otokul       ok
SFX I   ok   otoktól      ok
SFX I   ok   otokról      ok
SFX I   ok   otokra       ok
SFX I   ok   otokon       ok
SFX I   ok   otoknál      ok
SFX I   ok   otoknak      ok
SFX I   ok   otokként     ok
SFX I   ok   otokká       ok
SFX I   ok   otokkor      ok
SFX I   ok   otokkal      ok
SFX I   ok   otokig       ok
SFX I   ok   otokhoz      ok
SFX I   ok   otokból      ok
SFX I   ok   otokban      ok
SFX I   ok   otokba       ok
SFX I   ok   otokat       ok
SFX I   ok   otok         ok
SFX I   ok   ostul        ok
SFX I   ok   onként       ok
SFX I   ok   oméért       ok
SFX I   ok   omévá        ok
SFX I   ok   oméval       ok
SFX I   ok   oméul        ok
SFX I   ok   ométól       ok
SFX I   ok   omét         ok
SFX I   ok   oméról       ok
SFX I   ok   omért        ok
SFX I   ok   oméra        ok
SFX I   ok   oménál       ok
SFX I   ok   oménak       ok
SFX I   ok   omén         ok
SFX I   ok   oméiért      ok
SFX I   ok   oméivá       ok
SFX I   ok   oméival      ok
SFX I   ok   oméiul       ok
SFX I   ok   oméitól      ok
SFX I   ok   oméit        ok
SFX I   ok   oméiról      ok
SFX I   ok   oméira       ok
SFX I   ok   oméinál      ok
SFX I   ok   oméinak      ok
SFX I   ok   oméin        ok
SFX I   ok   oméiig       ok
SFX I   ok   oméihoz      ok
SFX I   ok   oméig        ok
SFX I   ok   oméiból      ok
SFX I   ok   oméiban      ok
SFX I   ok   oméiba       ok
SFX I   ok   oméi         ok
SFX I   ok   oméhoz       ok
SFX I   ok   oméból       ok
SFX I   ok   oméban       ok
SFX I   ok   oméba        ok
SFX I   ok   omé          ok
SFX I   ok   omul         ok
SFX I   ok   omtól        ok
SFX I   ok   omról        ok
SFX I   ok   omra         ok
SFX I   ok   omon         ok
SFX I   ok   omnál        ok
SFX I   ok   omnak        ok
SFX I   ok   ommá         ok
SFX I   ok   ommal        ok
SFX I   ok   omként       ok
SFX I   ok   omkor        ok
SFX I   ok   omig         ok
SFX I   ok   omhoz        ok
SFX I   ok   omból        ok
SFX I   ok   omban        ok
SFX I   ok   omba         ok
SFX I   ok   omat         ok
SFX I   ok   om           ok
SFX I   ok   okéért       ok
SFX I   ok   okévá        ok
SFX I   ok   okéval       ok
SFX I   ok   okéul        ok
SFX I   ok   okétól       ok
SFX I   ok   okét         ok
SFX I   ok   okéról       ok
SFX I   ok   okért        ok
SFX I   ok   okéra        ok
SFX I   ok   okénál       ok
SFX I   ok   okénak       ok
SFX I   ok   okén         ok
SFX I   ok   okéiért      ok
SFX I   ok   okéivá       ok
SFX I   ok   okéival      ok
SFX I   ok   okéiul       ok
SFX I   ok   okéitól      ok
SFX I   ok   okéit        ok
SFX I   ok   okéiról      ok
SFX I   ok   okéira       ok
SFX I   ok   okéinál      ok
SFX I   ok   okéinak      ok
SFX I   ok   okéin        ok
SFX I   ok   okéiig       ok
SFX I   ok   okéihoz      ok
SFX I   ok   okéig        ok
SFX I   ok   okéiból      ok
SFX I   ok   okéiban      ok
SFX I   ok   okéiba       ok
SFX I   ok   okéi         ok
SFX I   ok   okéhoz       ok
SFX I   ok   okéból       ok
SFX I   ok   okéban       ok
SFX I   ok   okéba        ok
SFX I   ok   oké          ok
SFX I   ok   okul         ok
SFX I   ok   októl        ok
SFX I   ok   okról        ok
SFX I   ok   okra         ok
SFX I   ok   okon         ok
SFX I   ok   oknál        ok
SFX I   ok   oknak        ok
SFX I   ok   okként       ok
SFX I   ok   okká         ok
SFX I   ok   okkor        ok
SFX I   ok   okkal        ok
SFX I   ok   okig         ok
SFX I   ok   okhoz        ok
SFX I   ok   okból        ok
SFX I   ok   okban        ok
SFX I   ok   okba         ok
SFX I   ok   okat         ok
SFX I   ok   odéért       ok
SFX I   ok   odévá        ok
SFX I   ok   odéval       ok
SFX I   ok   odéul        ok
SFX I   ok   odétól       ok
SFX I   ok   odét         ok
SFX I   ok   odéról       ok
SFX I   ok   odért        ok
SFX I   ok   odéra        ok
SFX I   ok   odénál       ok
SFX I   ok   odénak       ok
SFX I   ok   odén         ok
SFX I   ok   odéiért      ok
SFX I   ok   odéivá       ok
SFX I   ok   odéival      ok
SFX I   ok   odéiul       ok
SFX I   ok   odéitól      ok
SFX I   ok   odéit        ok
SFX I   ok   odéiról      ok
SFX I   ok   odéira       ok
SFX I   ok   odéinál      ok
SFX I   ok   odéinak      ok
SFX I   ok   odéin        ok
SFX I   ok   odéiig       ok
SFX I   ok   odéihoz      ok
SFX I   ok   odéig        ok
SFX I   ok   odéiból      ok
SFX I   ok   odéiban      ok
SFX I   ok   odéiba       ok
SFX I   ok   odéi         ok
SFX I   ok   odéhoz       ok
SFX I   ok   odéból       ok
SFX I   ok   odéban       ok
SFX I   ok   odéba        ok
SFX I   ok   odé          ok
SFX I   ok   odul         ok
SFX I   ok   odtól        ok
SFX I   ok   odról        ok
SFX I   ok   odra         ok
SFX I   ok   odon         ok
SFX I   ok   odnál        ok
SFX I   ok   odnak        ok
SFX I   ok   odként       ok
SFX I   ok   odkor        ok
SFX I   ok   odig         ok
SFX I   ok   odhoz        ok
SFX I   ok   oddá         ok
SFX I   ok   oddal        ok
SFX I   ok   odból        ok
SFX I   ok   odban        ok
SFX I   ok   odba         ok
SFX I   ok   odat         ok
SFX I   ok   od           ok
SFX I   ok   ocskáért     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskává      ok
SFX I   ok   ocskával     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskául      ok
SFX I   ok   ocskától     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskát       ok
SFX I   ok   ocskáról     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskára      ok
SFX I   ok   ocskánál     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskának     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskán       ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákért    ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákul     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskáktól    ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákról    ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákra     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákon     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskáknál    ok
SFX I   ok   ocskáknak    ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákká     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákkal    ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákig     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákhoz    ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákból    ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákban    ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákba     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskákat     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskák       ok
SFX I   ok   ocskáig      ok
SFX I   ok   ocskához     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskából     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskában     ok
SFX I   ok   ocskába      ok
SFX I   ok   ocska        ok
SFX I   ok   aként        [^dt]ok
SFX I   ok   akor         [^dt]ok
SFX I   ok   aiéért       ok
SFX I   ok   aiévá        ok
SFX I   ok   aiéval       ok
SFX I   ok   aiéul        ok
SFX I   ok   aiétól       ok
SFX I   ok   aiét         ok
SFX I   ok   aiéról       ok
SFX I   ok   aiért        ok
SFX I   ok   aiéra        ok
SFX I   ok   aiénál       ok
SFX I   ok   aiénak       ok
SFX I   ok   aién         ok
SFX I   ok   aiéiért      ok
SFX I   ok   aiéivá       ok
SFX I   ok   aiéival      ok
SFX I   ok   aiéiul       ok
SFX I   ok   aiéitól      ok
SFX I   ok   aiéit        ok
SFX I   ok   aiéiról      ok
SFX I   ok   aiéira       ok
SFX I   ok   aiéinál      ok
SFX I   ok   aiéinak      ok
SFX I   ok   aiéin        ok
SFX I   ok   aiéiig       ok
SFX I   ok   aiéihoz      ok
SFX I   ok   aiéig        ok
SFX I   ok   aiéiból      ok
SFX I   ok   aiéiban      ok
SFX I   ok   aiéiba       ok
SFX I   ok   aiéi         ok
SFX I   ok   aiéhoz       ok
SFX I   ok   aiéból       ok
SFX I   ok   aiéban       ok
SFX I   ok   aiéba        ok
SFX I   ok   aié          ok
SFX I   ok   aivá         ok
SFX I   ok   aival        ok
SFX I   ok   aiul         ok
SFX I   ok   aitól        ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéért    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokévá     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéval    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéul     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokétól    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokét      ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéról    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokért     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéra     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokénál    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokénak    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokén      ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéiért   ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéivá    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéival   ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéiul    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéitól   ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéit     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéiról   ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéira    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéinál   ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéinak   ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéin     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéiig    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéihoz   ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéig     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéiból   ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéiban   ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéiba    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéi      ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéhoz    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéból    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéban    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokéba     ok
SFX I   ok   aitoké       ok
SFX I   ok   aitokul      ok
SFX I   ok   aitoktól     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokról     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokra      ok
SFX I   ok   aitokon      ok
SFX I   ok   aitoknál     ok
SFX I   ok   aitoknak     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokként    ok
SFX I   ok   aitokká      ok
SFX I   ok   aitokkor     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokkal     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokig      ok
SFX I   ok   aitokhoz     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokból     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokban     ok
SFX I   ok   aitokba      ok
SFX I   ok   aitokat      ok
SFX I   ok   aitok        ok
